Tennessee, session 114, HB1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-142(a), is amended by deleting
"either" and inserting ", the comptroller of the treasury," immediately after "department of
commerce and insurance".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1478
010928
- 1 -